Nebraska, session 109, LB1022.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 79-808, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-808 (1) The board shall establish, adopt, and promulgate appropriate
rules, regulations, and procedures governing the issuance, renewal, conversion,
suspension, and revocation of certificates and permits to teach, provide
special services, and administer based upon (a) earned college credit in
humanities, social and natural sciences, mathematics, or career and technical
education, (b) earned college credit, or its equivalent in professional
education, for particular teaching, special services, or administrative
assignments, (c) criminal history record information if the applicant has not
been a continuous Nebraska resident for five years immediately preceding
application for the first issuance of a certificate, (d) human relations
training, except as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of this section for an
applicant for a Nebraska substitute teacher's certificate or as provided in
section 79-813 for a military spouse or an applicant who holds a certificate or
permit from another state, (e) successful teaching, administration, or
provision of special services, and (f) moral, mental, and physical fitness for
teaching, all in accordance with sound educational practices. Such rules,
regulations, and procedures shall also provide for endorsement requirements to
indicate areas of specialization on such certificates and permits. Such rules
and regulations shall not require any test of basic skills.
(2)(a) (2) The board may issue a temporary certificate, valid for a period
not to exceed two years, to any applicant for certification who has not
completed the human relations training requirement.
(b) An applicant for a Nebraska substitute teacher's certificate shall not
be required to meet the human relations training requirement under this section
to obtain such certificate.
(3) Members of any advisory committee established by the board to assist
the board in teacher education and certification matters shall be reimbursed
for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. Each school district
which has an employee who serves as a member of such committee and which is
required to hire a person to replace such member during the member's attendance
at meetings or activities of the committee or any subcommittee thereof shall be
reimbursed from the Certification Fund for the expense it incurs from hiring a
replacement. School districts may excuse employees who serve on such advisory
committees from certain duties which conflict with any advisory committee
duties.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-808, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
repealed.
-1-